Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.240

Rules.

The director has the power to adopt rules necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter.

[ 2002 c 332 s 20; 1989 c 419 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.